Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-485
Producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, exporter, or importer; security.

The department, for the first year of a new license or whenever it deems it necessary to insure compliance with sections 66-482 to 66-4,149, may require any producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, exporter, or importer subject to such sections to place with the department such security as it determines. The amount and duration of the security shall be fixed by the department and shall be approximately three times the total estimated average monthly tax liability payable by such producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, or importer pursuant to such sections. Such security shall consist of a surety bond executed by a surety company duly licensed and authorized to do business within this state in the amount specified by the department. In the case of an exporter, the amount and duration of the security shall be fixed by the department. Such security shall run to the Department of Revenue and be conditioned upon the payment of all taxes, interest, penalties, and costs for which such producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, exporter, or importer is liable, whether such liability was incurred prior to or after such security is filed.

Laws 1933, c. 106, § 2, p. 434;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-403;

R.S.1943, § 66-404;

Laws 1949, c. 186, § 1, p. 537;

Laws 1969, c. 528, § 2, p. 2160;

Laws 1973, LB 397, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 528, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 360, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-404;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 58;

Laws 2000, LB 1067, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB846, § 3.